Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1967YH (5) 91 th/ns H.F. 292 Section 1. Section 321.34, subsection 27, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. An owner referred to in subsection 12 who served in the 3 armed forces or reserve forces of the United States or the Iowa 4 national guard, regardless of the number of years of service, 5 and was discharged under honorable conditions may, upon 6 written application to the department and upon presentation 7 of satisfactory proof of military service and discharge under 8 honorable conditions, order special registration plates bearing 9 a distinguishing processed emblem depicting the word âveteranâ 10 below an image of the American flag. The application is 11 subject to approval by the department. The special plate fees 12 collected by the director under subsection 12 , paragraph âaâ , 13 from the annual validation of letter-number designated United 14 States veteran plates, and subsection 12 , paragraph âcâ , from 15 the issuance and annual validation of personalized United 16 States veteran plates, shall be paid monthly to the treasurer 17 of state and deposited in the road use tax fund. The treasurer 18 of state shall transfer monthly from the statutory allocations 19 fund created under section 321.145, subsection 2 , to the 20 veterans license fee fund created in section 35A.11 the amount 21 of the special fees collected under subsection 12 , paragraph 22 âaâ , in the previous month for United States veteran plates. 23